Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.235

Annexation of fire districts—Transfer of employees—Notice—Time limitation.

If any portion of a fire protection district is annexed to or incorporated into a city, code city or town, and as a result any employee is laid off who is eligible to transfer to the city, code city or town fire department under this section and RCW 35.13.215 and 35.13.225 the fire protection district shall notify the employee of the right to transfer and the employee shall have ninety days to transfer employment to the city, code city or town fire department.

[ 1986 c 254 s 9.]